Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Chapter 2

Landing and Loading Facilities

69-2-101. Acquisition and maintenance of facilities.

The department of transportation, acting through the commissioner of transportation, is authorized to acquire by purchase, condemnation, construction or otherwise, and to maintain and operate any public facilities the commissioner may deem suitable for the loading and landing of cargo wherever state highways intersect or parallel any navigable waters within or bounding the state.

Such powers shall in no way interfere with present property rights of now existing ferry franchises.

Acts 1935, ch. 36, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3252.1 (Williams, § 3260.1); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-201.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 6.

69-2-102. Powers of commissioner.

In the acquisition, maintenance, and operation of the facilities authorized under this chapter, the commissioner has all the powers conferred by and shall be subject to all the provisions contained in title 54, chapters 1-5 insofar as such powers and provisions may be applicable to the acquisition, maintenance, and operation of the facilities.

Acts 1935, ch. 36, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3252.2 (Williams, § 3260.2); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-202.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 54, chapter 6, part 1, formerly referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1983, ch. 320. Former part 2, formerly referred to in this section, was transferred to title 54, chapter 4, part 4 in 1988. See the Compiler's Notes under title 54, ch. 6 for a more detailed analysis.

69-2-103. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to perform any and all acts and to make such rules and regulations as may be appropriate for the purpose of carrying this chapter into full force and effect. Any violation of the rules and regulations made by the commissioner is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1935, ch. 36, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3252.3 (Williams, § 3260.3); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-203; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

69-2-104. Transportation department employees — Duties.

The commissioner may designate any employees of the department to perform services involved in the execution of this chapter, and such employees shall render such services without additional compensation.

Acts 1935, ch. 36, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3252.4 (Williams, § 3260.4); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-204.

69-2-105. Funds.

In order to carry out this chapter, the commissioner is authorized and directed to use, subject to the approval of the governor, any of the available funds set apart for the department that the commissioner deems appropriate for the funds, and such grants as may be made to the state of Tennessee by the United States or any agency, or instrumentality thereof or corporation owned thereby, for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1935, ch. 36, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3252.5 (Williams, § 3260.5); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-205.

69-2-106. Cooperation of other agencies.

In executing this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to cooperate with and seek and accept the assistance of any subdivision, agency or instrumentality of the state, the United States and any agency or instrumentality thereof or corporation owned thereby.

Acts 1935, ch. 36, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3252.6 (Williams, § 3260.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-206.

69-2-107. Purpose of chapter — Rights of United States.

The purpose of this chapter is declared to be to promote and facilitate traffic and commerce upon the waters of the state in the interest of its people, and to cooperate with and aid the United States in improving navigation upon such waters. In carrying out this chapter, due regard shall be had for the paramount rights of the United States government in the control of navigable waters.

Acts 1935, ch. 36, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3252.7 (Williams, § 3260.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-207.

69-2-108. Wharves to be kept in repair.

No owner, lessee, or such owner's or lessee's agent, in charge of a wharf upon any of the rivers of this state, where the same is kept or used for profit, shall be entitled to make and collect any charge whatever for wharfage, or the landing of boats, unless the wharf is, at the time of making such charge, in good repair, macadamized or cobblestoned. When it is not convenient to get stone, the owner of the wharf or bank may use such material as will put and keep the wharf or bank in repair.

Failure upon the part of anyone having charge of such wharf to keep the same in repair, as described in this section, is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1879, ch. 81, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 3550, 3551; Code 1932 §§ 7973, 7974; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-208, 70-209; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.